incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="eln/ias__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ias</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aiškinto/jas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jui</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ją</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jyje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>juje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jy</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jin</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jau</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jams</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jisna</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žmon/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>osna</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="elnias"><i>eln</i><par n="eln/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelias"><i>kel</i><par n="eln/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svečias"><i>sveč</i><par n="eln/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velnias"><i>veln</i><par n="eln/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apgaudinėtojas"><i>apgaudinėto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augintojas"><i>auginto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darbuotojas"><i>darbuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ėmėjas"><i>ėmė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavėjas"><i>gavė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gynėjas"><i>gynė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grimuotojas"><i>grimuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ieškotojas"><i>ieškoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="investuotojas"><i>investuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įžaidėjas"><i>įžaidė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliautojas"><i>keliauto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klausytojas"><i>klausyto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kūrėjas"><i>kūrė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lėbautojas"><i>lėbauto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liudytojas"><i>liudyto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesijas"><i>mesi</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naudotojas"><i>naudoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padavėjas"><i>padavė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasekėjas"><i>pasekė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pažeidėjas"><i>pažeidė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piešėjas"><i>piešė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pramogautojas"><i>pramogauto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="priėmėjas"><i>priėmė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="programuotojas"><i>programuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puoselėtojas"><i>puoselėto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rašytojas"><i>rašyto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rūšiuotojas"><i>rūšiuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siuvėjas"><i>siuvė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skriaudėjas"><i>skriaudė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steigėjas"><i>steigė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="supirkėjas"><i>supirkė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tardytojas"><i>tardyto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="testuotojas"><i>testuoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyrėjas"><i>tyrė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turėtojas"><i>turėto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaduotojas"><i>vaduoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vartotojas"><i>vartoto</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verpėjas"><i>verpė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="virėjas"><i>virė</i><par n="aiškinto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alternatyva"><i>alternatyv</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apkrova"><i>apkrov</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aronija"><i>aronij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atpjova"><i>atpjov</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autostrada"><i>autostrad</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bačka"><i>bačk</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalytoja"><i>dalytoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distancija"><i>distancij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrifikacija"><i>elektrifikacij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fėja"><i>fėj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gotika"><i>gotik</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imigracija"><i>imigracij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išmara"><i>išmar</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanapmarka"><i>kanapmark</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klasika"><i>klasik</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosmonautika"><i>kosmonautik</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavina"><i>lavin</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makaka"><i>makak</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minkštuma"><i>minkštum</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nepalaima"><i>nepalaim</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuotakuma"><i>nuotakum</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakyla"><i>pakyl</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pavyduliautoja"><i>pavyduliautoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plampa"><i>plamp</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presuotoja"><i>presuotoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puriena"><i>purien</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reorganizacija"><i>reorganizacij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sangrūda"><i>sangrūd</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="separacija"><i>separacij</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smala"><i>smal</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stumbrena"><i>stumbren</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarėja"><i>tarėj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trąšomaina"><i>trąšomain</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vadintoja"><i>vadintoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verbuotoja"><i>verbuotoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įgriuva"><i>įgriuv</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šlovintoja"><i>šlovintoj</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žmona"><i>žmon</i><par n="žmon/a__n"/></e>
